Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Product Warranties.

Sec. 45.27.100.
Warranty provided.

A manufacturer shall provide, through the authorized dealer, to the product’s ultimate purchaser from an authorized dealer the manufacturer’s standard warranty, if any, that is in effect at the time of delivery of the product to the authorized dealer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.110.
Nonconforming products.

A manufacturer of a nonconforming product shall, during the original warranty period, pay an authorized dealer to complete factory-recommended warranty repairs, solutions, and procedures to cure factory warranty problems with a nonconforming product. The manufacturer shall make the payment in accordance with the standard warranty service claim procedures and methods of the industry and with AS

45.27.100

—

45.27.220

.

If a part that is necessary to repair a nonconforming product of a nonconformity that is covered under a manufacturer’s warranty is not in an authorized dealer’s inventory when the nonconforming product is brought to the authorized dealer for repair, the manufacturer of the product shall provide the authorized dealer with the part. The manufacturer shall provide the part as soon as possible and may not charge for freight or handling. This subsection applies to a manufacturer whose products are sold in the state through an authorized dealer.

The manufacturer of a nonconforming product shall pay the cost for transporting a replacement for the nonconforming product from the manufacturer to the authorized dealer who sold the nonconforming product to the ultimate purchaser or the authorized dealer who is located nearest to the ultimate purchaser, whichever of the two authorized dealers the ultimate purchaser chooses. The manufacturer is not required to pay the transportation cost from the authorized dealer to the ultimate purchaser or from the ultimate purchaser to the authorized dealer.

In this section, “nonconforming product” means a product that has a nonconformity.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.120.
Authorized dealer warranty representations.

An authorized dealer may not make a representation about the warranty that is not made by the manufacturer in the warranty. An authorized dealer shall deliver the manuals on the operation and maintenance of a product to an ultimate purchaser and make the manufacturer’s warranty known to the ultimate purchaser, including all disclaimers and limitations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.130.
Warranty service and claims.

An authorized dealer shall provide warranty service in accordance with the manufacturer’s applicable warranty on all of the manufacturer’s products sold by the authorized dealer.

An authorized dealer shall make all claims for warranty reimbursement in the manner established by the manufacturer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.140.
Warranty restrictions.

A manufacturer may not, by dealership agreement, by restrictions on reimbursement, or by another method, restrict the nature or extent of product parts provided or labor performed by an authorized dealer if the restriction impairs the authorized dealer’s ability to satisfy a warranty created by the manufacturer in accordance with generally accepted standards.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.150.
Basis for reimbursements.

A manufacturer shall use the criteria established in this section to reimburse an authorized dealer for all approved warranty service work performed by the authorized dealer.

If the technician performing the warranty service work meets the certification standards in the dealership agreement, a manufacturer shall pay to a servicing authorized dealer warranty work labor rates that

are not less than the highest of the following:

the rate the authorized dealer customarily charges to a customer for nonwarranty service work;

the manufacturer’s printed flat rate; or

the rate established by a flat rate manual for dealers, if the manual is produced for dealers by a nationally respected industry consultant; and

include time for clean-up, preparation, diagnosis, disassembly, repair, assembly, testing, and final cleaning as needed to provide a quality result and customer satisfaction.

In addition to the payment under (b) of this section, the manufacturer shall reimburse an authorized dealer a minimum of one hour at the authorized dealer’s shop standard labor rate for the administration of each warranty claim.

A manufacturer shall reimburse the authorized dealer for product parts in the authorized dealer’s inventory at the current manufacturer’s full suggested retail price.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.160.
Timely reimbursement for claims.

A manufacturer shall pay a properly submitted warranty claim of an authorized dealer within 30 days after receiving the claim from an authorized dealer. Unless a manufacturer issues a written notice of disapproval under AS

45.27.170

within the 30 days, if a manufacturer fails to pay a claim within 30 days after receipt, the failure is considered an acceptance of the claim as submitted, and the manufacturer shall pay the authorized dealer interest at the rate of 1.5 percent a month on the claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.170.
Warranty claim disapproval.

If a manufacturer does not approve a claim submitted under AS

45.27.160

, the manufacturer shall issue a written notice of disapproval to the authorized dealer within 30 days after the manufacturer receives the claim. The notice must contain the specific reasons for the disapproval.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.180.
Repairs required.

If a product does not conform to a warranty that is applicable to it and the ultimate purchaser of the product reports the nonconformity to the manufacturer of the product or to the manufacturer’s authorized dealer during the term of the warranty, the manufacturer or authorized dealer shall make the necessary repairs to conform the product to the warranty.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.190.
Replacement or refund.

If, during the term of a warranty or within one year after the date of the delivery of the product to the ultimate purchaser, whichever period of time terminates first, the manufacturer or authorized dealer is unable to conform a product to an applicable warranty after a reasonable number of attempts, the manufacturer shall accept the return of the nonconforming product, and, at the ultimate purchaser’s option, shall replace the nonconforming product with a new comparable product or refund the full purchase price to the owner after deducting a reasonable amount of money for the ultimate purchaser’s use of the product from the date the product was delivered to the ultimate purchaser.

The reasonable amount of money deducted under (a) of this section may not exceed an amount that is equal to the sum of

the amount of money that reflects the depreciation in value of the product for the period during which the product was available for use by the ultimate purchaser, as calculated by a straight line depreciation method over seven years; and

an amount of money that is equal to the depreciation in value of the product that was caused by

neglect or abuse by the ultimate purchaser; or

body damage that was not caused by the nonconformity.

The manufacturer shall make the refund required by this section

to the lienholder of record for the product, if any, to the extent of the lienholder’s interest, and, if there is a balance after satisfying the lienholder’s interest, to the ultimate purchaser; or

entirely to the ultimate purchaser, if there is no lienholder of record for the product.

In this section,

“costs” include original registration fees, transportation fees, authorized dealer’s preparation fees, and the cost of options installed by the authorized dealer;

“full purchase price” means the total price paid for a product by the ultimate purchaser, including any costs added to the retail price.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.200.
Notice by ultimate purchaser.

To claim a refund or replacement under AS

45.27.190

, an ultimate purchaser shall give written notice by certified mail to the manufacturer and its authorized dealer before 60 days have elapsed after the termination of whichever of the following periods of time terminates first:

the term of the warranty; or

one year after the date of delivery of the product to the ultimate purchaser.

The notice required by (a) of this section must

state that the product has a nonconformity;

provide a reasonable description of the nonconformity;

state that the manufacturer or authorized dealer has made a reasonable number of attempts to conform the product to the warranty; and

state that the ultimate purchaser demands that a refund or a replacement of the product be delivered on or before the 60th day after the mailing date of the written notice.

Within 30 days after receiving the notice required by this section, the manufacturer may make a final attempt to conform the product before the manufacturer is required to make a refund or replacement under AS

45.27.190

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.210.
Exceptions.

An ultimate purchaser may not receive a refund for or replacement of a product under AS

45.27.190

—

45.27.220

if the manufacturer shows that the problem or condition because of which the ultimate purchaser is claiming a refund or a replacement

is not a nonconformity; or

is a nonconformity that resulted from

alteration of the product by the ultimate purchaser, or by a person who is not the authorized dealer or otherwise authorized by the manufacturer or distributor to make the alteration; or

abuse or neglect by the ultimate purchaser or another person other than the authorized dealer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.220.
Presumption.

A rebuttable presumption that a reasonable number of attempts have been made to conform a product to an applicable warranty is established if

the nonconformity continues to exist even though the same nonconformity has been subject to repair three or more times by the manufacturer or authorized dealer during the term of the warranty or the one-year period after the date of delivery of the product to the ultimate purchaser, whichever period of time terminates first; or

the product is out of service for repair for a total of 30 or more days on which the authorized dealer is open for business during the term of the warranty or during the one-year period after the date of delivery of the product to the ultimate purchaser, whichever period of time terminates first; a period of time during which repairs are not performed for reasons that are beyond the control of the manufacturer or authorized dealer is not included in satisfying the 30-day time period.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)